Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 11-1401, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 11-1401. A. It shall be unlawful for any person to
enter that part of a turnpike enclosed by fence except in a vehicle
at authorized entrances.
B. It shall be unlawful for the driver of any vehicle to fail
to pay the toll as prescribed by the Oklahoma Turnpike Authority.
C. It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a vehicle on
a turnpike with knowledge that the registered owner of the vehicle
is liable for any outstanding toll evasion violations issued
Req. No. 12305 Page 1

purs uant to paragraph 7 of subsection B of Section 11-1401.2 of this
title.
D. It shall be unlawful for any person to cross a turnpike
except at grade separations provided for cross traffic or through
drainage structures under the turnpike.
E. It shall be unlawful for any person to travel a turnpike on
foot except to leave or service a disabled vehicle, or for any
person to hitchhike on a turnpike.
F. It shall be unlawful for any person to tear down, damage or
remove any turnpike fence.
G. It shall be unlawful to drive, operate or ride any bicycle
or other man-powered vehicle or means of transportation on a
turnpike. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority may prohibit any light,
mechanically powered vehicle from entering the turnpike, or any
other vehicle it determines would be injurious to the turnpike
surfacing or would be a traffic hazard.
H. When any section of highway has been closed to traffic by
the Oklahoma Turnpike Authority and traffic-control devices or
barricades have been erected, it shall be unlawful for any person to
drive any vehicle through, under, over, or around the traffic-
control devices or barricades, or otherwise to enter the closed
area.
I. Subsections A through H of this section shall not apply to:

Req. No. 12305 Page 2

1. Officers, employees, agents or contractors of the Oklahoma
Turnpike Authority in performance of their duties;
2. Commissioned officers of the Department of Public Safety;
3. Emergency vehicle operators at the request of the Department
of Public Safety;
4. Rural Firefighters in official emergency vehicles in the
performance of their duties; or
4. 5. Agents, employees or contractors of public utilities
while actually engaged in work in furtherance of construction,
maintenance or repair of such public utilities located on, above or
below a turnpike.
J. It shall be unlawful for any vehicle, except:
1. Authorized emergency vehicles;
2. Vehicles owned by the Oklahoma Turnpike Authority, its
agents or contractors;
3. Vehicles owned by public utilities, their agents, employees
or contractors, while actually engaged in construction, maintenance
or repair of such public utilities; and
4. Wrecker vehicles while performing services at the request of
the Department of Public Safety,
to cross the center dividing strip of a turnpike, or to travel on
any lane of a turnpike in a direction contrary to the direction of
traffic on such lane.

Req. No. 12305 Page 3

K. All vehicles traveling on a turnpike shall comply at all
times with signs placed on the turnpike regulating traffic thereon.
L. No vehicle shall move from one lane to another unless the
way is clear to do so and upon proper signaling.
M. Any person who violates any provision of this section shall,
upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished as
provided in Section 17-101 of this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12305 MJ 01/31/25














Req. No. 12305 Page 4